District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.06

Time for filing registration applications.

(a)

An application for a registration certificate shall be filed (and a registration certificate issued) prior to taking possession of a firearm from a licensed dealer or from any person or organization holding a registration certificate therefor. In all other cases, an application for registration shall be filed immediately after a firearm is brought into the District. It shall be deemed compliance with the preceding sentence if such person personally communicates with the Metropolitan Police Department (as determined by the Chief to be sufficient) and provides such information as may be demanded; provided, that such person files an application for a registration certificate within 48 hours after such communication.

(b)

Repealed.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 206, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-62, § 2, 24 DCR 5780
Sept. 29, 2012, D.C. Law 19-170, § 2(g), 59 DCR 5691
1981 Ed., § 6-2316.
1973 Ed., § 6-1816.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-170 repealed (b), which formerly read: “Any firearm validly registered under prior regulations must be registered pursuant to this unit in accordance with procedures to be promulgated by the Chief. An application to register such firearm shall be filed pursuant to this unit within 60 days of September 24, 1976.”
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(g) of Firearms Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-352, May 11, 2012, 59 DCR 5116).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(g) of the Firearms Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-394, July 18, 2012, 59 DCR 8694).
For temporary repeal of (b), see § 2(g) of the Firearms Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-510, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12808).